District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.09

Freedom of information exception; report.

(a)

Any record regarding a person who has applied for, received, or had revoked a license shall not be made available as a public record under § 2-532; provided, that aggregate data, excluding any personal identifying information, may be used for the purposes of the public report in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

Every 2 years, the MPD shall make public a report that includes the following information:

(1)

The total number of valid licenses; and

(2)

For the most recent 2-year period:

(A)

The number of applications for a license received;

(B)

The number of licenses issued;

(C)

The number of licenses renewed, suspended, revoked, or denied;

(D)

The number of licensees convicted of a crime involving a pistol, classified by type of crime;

(E)

The number of pistols for which a license was issued that were reported lost or stolen; and

(F)

The number of pistols for which a license was issued that were found or recovered as stolen that were unreported by a licensee as lost or stolen.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 909
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944